District of Columbia statutes.
28-4506

Criminal enforcement by the District of Columbia.

Every person who violates section 28-4502 or 28-4503 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, on conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01], or by imprisonment not exceeding one (1) year, or both. The Corporation Counsel shall commence and try all prosecutions for violations of section 28-4502 or 28-4503 . Whenever a corporation violates section 28-4502 or 28-4503 , the individual directors, officers, or agents of such corporation who have intentionally authorized, ordered or ratified the acts constituting such violation shall be punishable in accordance with this section.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 2, 27 DCR 5368
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 285(e), 60 DCR 2064
This section is referenced in § 28-4510 and § 28-4511.
1981 Ed., § 28-4506.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not exceeding $50,000”).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 285(e) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.